Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 601.6, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 601.6. A. For purposes of this section, the term
"children and youth service system" shall have the same meaning as
it is defined in Section 600 of this title.
B. The Office of Juvenile System Oversight shall have the
responsibility of inspecting and investigating and reporting
misfeasance and malfeasance within the children and youth service
system, inquiring into areas of concern, investigating complaints
filed with the Office of Juvenile System Oversight, and performing

issue-specific systemic monitoring as directed by the Oklahoma
Commission on Children and Youth of the children and youth service
system, to ascertain compliance with established responsibilities.
It shall be the duty of the
C. The Office of Juvenile System Oversight to shall conduct not
less than one but not more than two regular, periodic, unannounced
inspections of state-operated children's institutions and facilities
and to review the reports of the inspections of the State Fire
Marshal and the Department of Health and any agencies which accredit
such institutions and facilities annually. The Office is further
authorized to inspect privately operated children's institutions and
facilities that receive state or federal funding, on a periodic
basis or as needed.
D. The Office shall investigate complaints filed with the
Office regarding the children and youth service system.
B. E. The Office of Juvenile System Oversight shall have the
authority to:
1. Have the authority to examine and copy all records and
budgets pertaining to the children and youth service system and to
interview the residents of such facilities and shall have access to
Access all facilities within the children and youth service system
for the purpose of conducting systemic oversight inspections and
complaint investigations;
2. Have the authority to subpoena witnesses and hold public
hearings Examine and copy all records and budgets pertaining to the
children and youth service system and to review inspection reports
of the State Fire Marshal, State Department of Health, and any other
agency that accredits such institutions and facilities;
3. Interview the residents of institutions and facilities
within the children and youth service system;
4. Subpoena witnesses and hold public hearings;
5. Establish, in accordance with the Dispute Resolution Act,
Sections 1801 through 1813 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes, a
voluntary program for foster parents to mediate complaints
concerning the rights of foster parents, as provided for in Section
1-9-119 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, that relate to
ENR. H. B. NO. 1574 Page 2

certain actions, inactions or decisions of the Department of Human
Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or child-placing
agencies that may adversely affect the safety and well-being of
children in the custody of the state;
4. 6. Receive any complaint alleging that an employee of the
Department of Human Services or a child-placing agency has
threatened a foster parent with removal of a child from the foster
parent, harassed a foster parent, or refused to place a child in a
licensed or certified foster home, or disrupted a child placement as
retaliation or discrimination towards a foster parent who has:
a. filed a grievance pursuant to Section 1-9-120 of Title
10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,
b. provided information to any state official or
Department employee, or
c. testified, assisted, or otherwise participated in an
investigation, proceeding, or hearing against the
Department or child-placing agency.
The Office of Juvenile System Oversight shall forward the
complaints to the Office of Client Advocacy for investigation
pursuant to subsection D of Section 1-9-112 of Title 10A of the
Oklahoma Statutes. The Office of Juvenile System Oversight shall
work with the Office of Client Advocacy to ensure the complaints are
investigated and resolved in accordance with the grievance
procedures provided in Section 1-9-120 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to any
complaint by a foster parent regarding the result of a criminal,
administrative, or civil proceeding for a violation of any law,
rule, or contract provision by that foster parent, or the action
taken by the Department or a child-placing agency in conformity with
the result of any such proceeding;
5. 7. Issue reports to the Governor, Speaker of the House of
Representatives, President Pro Tempore of the Senate, Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court of the State of Oklahoma, any appropriate
prosecutorial agency, the director of the agency under
consideration, and other persons as necessary and appropriate; and
6. 8. Provide recommendations to the Oklahoma Commission on
Children and Youth on or before May 1 of each year.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1574 Page 3

C. F. The Office of Juvenile System Oversight shall not release
information that would identify a person who makes a complaint to
the Office, unless a court of competent jurisdiction orders release
of the information for good cause shown.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1574 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1574 Page 5